District of Columbia statutes.
21-154

Ratification of sales by court.

A sale of property of an infant is not effectual to pass title to the property sold until it is reported to and ratified by the court.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 743, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1

History

1981 Ed., § 21-154.
1973 Ed., § 21-154.

Prior Codifications